Wisconsin, session 2025, AB335.
do enact as follows:AB335,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB335,27Section 2. 20.255 (3) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB335,2,9820.255 (3) (cm) School social worker intern stipends. The amounts in the 9schedule for payments to school social worker interns under s. 115.428.AB335,310Section 3. 115.428 of the statutes is created to read:AB335,2,1311115.428 School social worker intern stipends. From the appropriation 12under s. 20.255 (3) (cm), beginning in the 2026-27 school year, the department shall 13provide payments to individuals who are all of the following:AB335,2,1514(1) Enrolled in an institution of higher education or an accredited graduate 15school in a program of study leading to licensure as a school social worker.AB335,2,1716(2) Placed as a school social worker intern in a public school governed by a 17school board.AB335,418Section 4. Effective date.AB335,2,2019(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 20publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB335,2,2121